pl: Typ dachu: Dach nieprzezroczysty; Zamknięty dach; Odłączany dach; Otwarty dach; Zwijany dach; Inny
fi: Katon tyyppi: Pimennyskatto; Umpikatto; Irrotettava katto; Avokatto; Rullattava katto; Muu
bg-BG: Тип покрив: Затъмнен покрив; Затворен покрив; Подвижен покрив; Отворен покрив; Сгъваем покрив; Друго
es: Tipo de techo: Techo opaco; Techo cerrado; Techo desmontable; Descapotable; Techo corredizo; Otro
pt-BR: Teto tipo: Teto blackout; Teto fechado; Teto removível; Teto aberto; Teto retrátil; Outro
zh-TW: 頂部類型: 遮光車頂; 封閉式車頂; 可拆卸式車頂; 敞篷; 捲縮式車頂; 其他
vi: Loại mái nhà: Mui che sáng; Mui kín; Mui tháo rời; Mui trần; Mui cuộn; Khác
da: Tagtype: Mørklægningstag; Lukket tag; Aftageligt tag; Åbent tag; Rulletag; Andet
hu: Tetőtípus: Sötétítőtető; Zárt tető; Levehető tető; Nyitott tető; Eltolható tető; Egyéb
ja: 屋根の種類: ブラックアウトルーフ; クローズドルーフ; デタッチャブルルーフ; オープントップ; ロールバックルーフ; その他
sk-SK: Typ strechy: Zatemňovacia strecha; Uzavretá strecha; Odnímateľná strecha; Otvorená strecha; Zasúvacia strecha; Iné
nl: Daktype: Verduisterend dak; Gesloten dak; Afneembaar dak; Open dak; Oprolbaar dak; Overige
el: Τύπος στέγης: Σκοτεινή οροφή; Κλειστή οροφή; Αποσπώμενη οροφή; Ανοικτή οροφή; Συρόμενη οροφή; Άλλο
nb: Taktype: Lystett tak; Lukket tak; Avtakbart tak; Åpen topp; Rulletak; Annet
lt-LT: Stogo tipas: Užtamsintas stogas; Uždaras stogas; Nuimamas stogas; Atviras viršus; Atitraukiamas stogas; Kita
de: Dachtyp: Blackout-Dach; Geschlossenes Dach; Abnehmbares Dach; Offenes Dach; Faltschiebedach; Sonstige
fr: Type de toit: Toit occultant; Toit fermé; Toit amovible; Toit ouvert; Toit ouvrant coulissant; Autre
cs: Typ střechy: Zatemňovací střecha; Pevná střecha; Odnímatelná střecha; Otevřená střecha; Stahovací střecha; Jiné
tr: Çatı tipi: Karartma tavan; Kapalı tavan; Sökülebilir tavan; Üstü açık; Geri çekilebilir tavan; Diğer
zh-CN: 顶棚类型: 遮光车顶; 封闭式车顶; 可拆卸车顶; 敞篷; 后卷式车顶; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de acoperiș: Plafon opac; Plafon închis; Plafon detașabil; Decapotabil; Plafon retractabil; Altele
ko: 지붕 유형: 블랙아웃 루프; 클로즈드 루프; 탈착식 루프; 오픈 톱; 롤백 루프; 기타
sv: Taktyp: Mörkläggande tak; Stängt tak; Avtagbart tak; Öppet tak; Rulltak; Övrigt
it: Tipo di tetto: Tetto oscurante; Tetto chiuso; Tetto removibile; Senza tetto; Tetto avvolgibile; Altro
en: Roof type: Blackout roof; Closed roof; Detachable roof; Open top; Roll-back roof; Other
th: ประเภทหลังคา: หลังคากันแสงทึบ; หลังคาปิดทึบ; หลังคาถอดได้; เปิดประทุน; หลังคาพับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип крыши: Непрозрачная крыша; Закрытая крыша; Съемная крыша; Открытый верх; Сдвижная крыша; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de teto: Tejadilho opaco; Tejadilho fechado; Tejadilho amovível; Tejadilho aberto; Tejadilho de enrolar; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta krova: Zatamnjeni krov; Zatvoreni krov; Odvojivi krov; Otvoreni krov; Sklopivi krov; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta strehe: Zatemnitvena streha; Zaprta streha; Snemljiva streha; Odprta streha; Pomična streha; Drugo